Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3314
Act, how interpreted.

Sections 77-3301 to 77-3316 shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact them.

Laws 1976, LB 584, § 14.